Wisconsin, session 2025, SB363.
do enact as follows:SB363,13Section 1. 48.65 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB363,2,9148.65 (1) No Except as provided under s. 48.651 (4), no person may for 2compensation provide care and supervision for 4 or more children under the age of 37 for less than 24 hours a day unless that person obtains a license to operate a child 4care center from the department. To obtain a license under this subsection to 5operate a child care center, a person must meet the minimum requirements for a 6license established by the department under s. 48.67, meet the requirements 7specified in s. 48.686, and pay the license fee under sub. (3). A license issued under 8this subsection is valid until revoked or suspended, but shall be reviewed every 2 9years as provided in s. 48.66 (5).SB363,210Section 2. 48.651 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB363,2,131148.651 (4) (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and (c), a person certified under 12this section may care for up to 6 children under the age of 7, regardless of whether 13the children are related to the provider.SB363,2,1514(b) If the person is caring for 3 children under the age of 2, the person may 15care for up to 5 children in total.SB363,2,1716(c) If the person is caring for 4 children under the age of 2, the person may 17care for up to 4 children in total.SB363,2,1818